Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-2420
Electronic funds transfer system; authorized.

In order to provide greater efficiency in the administration of the taxes collected by the state and convenience for the taxpayers of this state, the Director of Administrative Services and the State Treasurer may establish and operate an electronic funds transfer system for the collection of taxes and the payment of refunds. The Department of Administrative Services and the Department of Revenue shall jointly establish the procedures necessary to implement the system.

The use of electronic funds transfer or any other payment means by the state shall not create any rights that would not have been created had an individual state warrant been used as the payment medium. The use of electronic funds transfer or any other individual payment to the state shall not create any rights that would not have been created had an individual check been used as the payment medium to the state.

Laws 1985, LB 273, § 12.